Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1241.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.327, No.85), known as the Auctioneer Licensing and Trading Assistant Registration Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 17.1. Horses sold at auction.(a) Duty of auction company.--Before a horse may be sold at auction, the auction company shall determine whether the horse has an implanted microchip or has been tattooed or branded with any identifying mark. If the horse has an implanted microchip, tattoo or brand, the auction company shall post, on its publicly accessible Internet website, all identifying information, including any identification number contained in the microchip 12345678910111213141516171819 and a detailed description or photograph of any tattoo or brand found on the horse.(b) Limitation.--A horse may not be offered for sale at auction before 72 hours have elapsed following posting of the horse's identifying information on the auction company's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Required recordkeeping.--For a minimum of one year following the date of sale, for each horse sold at auction, an auction company shall maintain appropriate records which accurately document compliance with this section, including:(1) The presence or absence of a microchip, tattoo or brand.(2) The date and time of the posting of the information required by this section.(3) The date and time each horse was sold at auction.Section 2. This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB1241PN1390 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516